District of Columbia statutes.
47-4106

Fraud and false statements.

(a)

A person who willfully makes and subscribes, delivers, or discloses a return, statement, list, account, or other document required under this title, or under regulations made under authority thereof, which he or she does not believe to be true and correct as to every material matter, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $5,000, or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both, together with costs of prosecution.

(b)

A person who willfully aids or assists in, procures, counsels, or advises the preparation or presentation under, or in connection with, a matter arising under this title, or under regulations made under authority thereof, of a return, affidavit, claim, list, account, or other document, which is fraudulent or is false as to any material matter, whether or not the falsity or fraud is with the knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present the return, affidavit, claim, list, account, or document, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $5,000, or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both, together with costs of prosecution.

(c)

A person who willfully makes and subscribes, delivers, or discloses a return, statement, list, account, or other document required under this title, or under regulations made under authority thereof, which he or she does not believe to be true and correct as to every matter, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $3,000, or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both, together with costs of prosecution.

(d)

A person who willfully aids or assists in, procures, counsels, or advises the preparation or presentation under, or in connection with, any matter arising under this title, or under regulations made under authority thereof, of a return, affidavit, claim, list, account, or other document, which is fraudulent or is false as to any matter, whether or not the falsity or fraud is with the knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present the return, affidavit, claim, list, account, or document, shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $3,000, or imprisoned not more than 180 days, or both, together with costs of prosecution.

(e)

All prosecutions under this section shall be brought in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia on information by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia in the name of the District.

(f)

The fines set forth in this section shall not be limited by [§ 22-3571.01].

History

Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-204, § 2(b), 47 DCR 5799
June 12, 2003, D.C. Law 14-310, § 11(c), 50 DCR 1092
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(n)(6), 52 DCR 2638
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 113(d)(2), 60 DCR 2064

Section References

This section is referenced in § 16-801.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-310, in subsec. (c), deleted “material” preceding “matter”.
D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added (f).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 113(d)(2) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.